Massachusetts, session 194th, H1446.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 15D of Chapter 76 of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby amended by
striking the original Section 15D and replacing it with the following:
“Section 15D. Section 15D. No newly enrolled full-time student attending a college,
university or secondary school shall be registered at the institution except upon presentation of a
medical certificate that the student has been immunized against meningococcal disease in
accordance with the recommendations of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention
Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices or on the condition that a medical certificate
documenting immunization against meningococcal disease shall be provided within 30 days of
registration; but a student may be registered at the institution upon certification made, in writing,
by a physician who has personally examined the student and in whose opinion the physical
condition of the student is such that his health would be endangered by the immunization. The
department of public health shall promulgate rules and regulations and additional guidance for
of 2

enforcement of this section in accordance with section 15 of this chapter. In the absence of an
emergency or epidemic of disease declared by the department of public health, no student who
states in writing that immunization would conflict with his religious beliefs shall be required to
present the medical certificate in order to be admitted to the institution. This section shall not
require an institution to provide the vaccine or the expense for the vaccine against
meningococcal disease.
of 2